Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.310

Assistance for parolees, work release, and discharged prisoners—Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of RCW 9.95.310 through 9.95.370 is to provide necessary assistance, other than assistance which is authorized to be provided under the vocational rehabilitation laws, Title 28A RCW, under the public assistance laws, Title 74 RCW or the employment security department or other state agency, for parolees, inmates assigned to work/training release facilities, discharged prisoners and persons convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984, and granted probation in need and whose capacity to earn a living under these circumstances is impaired; and to help such persons attain self-care and/or self-support for rehabilitation and restoration to independence as useful citizens as rapidly as possible thereby reducing the number of returnees to the institutions of this state to the benefit of such person and society as a whole.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 347; 1986 c 125 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 31 s 1; 1961 c 217 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.